District of Columbia statutes.
6-641.14

Laws repealed.

The Act of March 1, 1920 (41 Stat. 500, ch. 92), excepting the provisions of § 6-621.01 creating the Zoning Commission, providing for its membership and service without additional compensation, are hereby repealed. All laws or parts of other laws in conflict with the provisions of this subchapter are hereby repealed.

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 802, ch. 534, § 15
1981 Ed., § 5-431.
1973 Ed., § 5-427.